Rhode Island, session 2025, SB818.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-19-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-19 entitled "Sentence
and Execution" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-19-18. Termination of imprisonment on deferred sentence on failure of grand jury
to indict — Determinations of insufficient evidence lack of probable cause or exercise of
prosecutorial discretion.
(a) Whenever any person has been sentenced to imprisonment for violation of a deferred
sentence by reason of the alleged commission of a felony and the grand jury has failed to return
any indictment or an information has not been filed on the charge which was specifically alleged
to have constituted the violation of the deferred sentence, the sentence to imprisonment for the
alleged violation of the deferred sentence shall, on motion made to the court on behalf of the person
so sentenced, be quashed, and imprisonment shall be immediately terminated, and the deferred
sentence shall have same force and effect as if no sentence to imprisonment had been imposed.
(b) Whenever any person, after an evidentiary hearing, has been sentenced to imprisonment
for violation of a suspended sentence or probationary period by reason of the alleged commission
of a felony or misdemeanor said sentence of imprisonment shall, on a motion made to the court on
behalf of the person so sentenced, be quashed, and imprisonment shall be terminated when any of
the following occur on the charge which was specifically alleged to have constituted the violation:
(1) After trial person is found “not guilty” or a motion for judgment of acquittal or to
dismiss is made and granted pursuant to Superior or District Court Rule of Criminal Procedure 29;

(2) After hearing evidence, a “no true bill” is returned by the grand jury;
(3) After consideration by an assistant or special assistant designated by the attorney
general, a “no information” based upon a lack of probable cause is returned;
(4) A motion to dismiss is made and granted pursuant to the Rhode Island general laws §
12-12-1.7 and/or Superior Court Rule of Criminal Procedure 9.1; or
(5) The charge fails to proceed in District or Superior Court under circumstances where the
state is indicating a lack of probable cause, or circumstances where the state or its agents believe
there is doubt about the culpability of the accused are unwilling or unable to pursue the charge(s)
and the matter is dismissed.
(c) This section shall apply to all individuals sentenced to imprisonment for violation of a
suspended sentence or probationary period by reason of the alleged commission of a felony or
misdemeanor and shall not alter the ability of the court to revoke a suspended sentence or
probationary period for an allegation of conduct that does not rise to the level of criminal conduct.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002326
========
LC002326 - Page 2 of 3